Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.070

Budget priorities and levels of funding—Submission of budget outlines and priorities to the office of financial management—Prioritized list.

(1) The council shall identify budget priorities and levels of funding for higher education, including the two and four-year institutions of higher education and state financial aid programs. It is the intent of the legislature for the council to make budget recommendations for allocations for major policy changes in accordance with priorities set forth in the ten-year plan, but the legislature does not intend for the council to review and make recommendations on individual institutional budgets. It is the intent of the legislature that recommendations from the council prioritize funding needs for the overall system of higher education in accordance with priorities set forth in the ten-year plan. It is also the intent of the legislature that the council's recommendations take into consideration the total per-student funding at similar public institutions of higher education in the global challenge states.

(2) By December of each odd-numbered year, the council shall outline the council's fiscal priorities under the ten-year plan that it must distribute to the institutions, the state board for community and technical colleges, the office of financial management, and the joint higher education committee.

(a) Capital budget outlines for the two-year institutions shall be submitted to the office of financial management by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and shall include the prioritized ranking of the capital projects being requested, a description of each capital project, and the amount and fund source being requested.

(b) Capital budget outlines for the four-year institutions must be submitted to the office of financial management by August 15th of each even-numbered year, and must include: The institutions' priority ranking of the project; the capital budget category within which the project will be submitted to the office of financial management in accordance with RCW 43.88D.010; a description of each capital project; and the amount and fund source being requested.

(c) The office of financial management shall reference these reporting requirements in its budget instructions.

(3) The council shall submit recommendations on the operating budget priorities to support the ten-year plan to the office of financial management by October 1st each year, and to the legislature by January 1st each year.

(4)(a) The office of financial management shall develop one prioritized list of capital projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but not funded. The prioritized list of capital projects shall be based on the following priorities in the following order:

(i) Office of financial management scores pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW;

(ii) Preserving assets;

(iii) Degree production; and

(iv) Maximizing efficient use of instructional space.

(b) The office of financial management shall include all of the capital projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education, except for the minor works projects, in the prioritized list of capital projects provided to the legislature.

(c) The form of the prioritized list for capital projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education shall be provided as one list, ranked in priority order with the highest priority project ranked number "1" through the lowest priority project numbered last. The ranking for the prioritized list of capital projects may not:

(i) Include subpriorities;

(ii) Be organized by category;

(iii) Assume any state bond or building account biennial funding level to prioritize the list; or

(iv) Assume any specific share of projects by institution in the priority list.

(5) Institutions and the state board for community and technical colleges shall submit any supplemental capital budget requests and revisions to the office of financial management by November 1st and to the legislature by January 1st.

(6) For the 2019-2021 fiscal biennium and the 2021-2023 fiscal biennium, pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, the office of financial management may, but is not obligated to, develop one prioritized list of capital projects for the legislature to consider that includes all of the projects requested by the four-year institutions of higher education that were scored by the office of financial management pursuant to chapter 43.88D RCW, including projects that were previously scored but not funded.

[ 2021 c 332 s 7044; 2019 c 413 s 7029; 2018 c 298 s 7014; 2012 c 229 s 110; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 104; 2010 c 245 s 10; 2008 c 205 s 4; 2007 c 458 s 202; 2004 c 275 s 7; 2003 c 130 s 3; 1997 c 369 s 10; 1996 c 174 s 1; 1993 c 363 s 6; 1985 c 370 s 4. Formerly RCW 28B.76.210, 28B.80.330.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2021 c 332: See note following RCW 43.19.501.

Effective date—2019 c 413: See note following RCW 28B.15.210.

Effective date—2018 c 298: See note following RCW 79.17.210.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Findings—Expand on demand—System design plan endorsed—2010 c 245: See note following RCW 28B.50.020.

Part headings not law—2007 c 458: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.

Findings—Intent—2003 c 130: "(1) The legislature finds that:

(a) At the time the *higher education coordinating board was created in 1985, the legislature wanted a board with a comprehensive mission that included planning, budget and program review authority, and program administration;

(b) Since its creation, the board has achieved numerous accomplishments, including proposals leading to creation of the branch campus system, and has made access and affordability of higher education a consistent priority;

(c) However, higher education in Washington state is currently at a crossroads. Demographic, economic, and technological changes present new and daunting challenges for the state and its institutions of higher education. As the state looks forward to the future, the legislature, the governor, and institutions need a common strategic vision to guide planning and decision making.

(2) Therefore, it is the legislature's intent to reaffirm and strengthen the strategic planning role of the *higher education coordinating board. It is also the legislature's intent to examine options for reassigning or altering other roles and responsibilities to enable the board to place priority and focus on planning and coordination." [ 2003 c 130 s 1.]

*Reviser's note: The higher education coordinating board was abolished by 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 301, effective July 1, 2012.

Findings—1993 c 363: "The legislature finds a need to redefine the relationship between the state and its postsecondary education institutions through a compact based on trust, evidence, and a new alignment of responsibilities. As the proportion of the state budget dedicated to postsecondary education programs has continued to decrease and the opportunity for this state's citizens to participate in such programs also has declined, the state institutions of higher education have increasingly less flexibility to respond to emerging challenges through innovative management and programming. The legislature finds that this state has not provided its institutions of higher education with the ability to effectively achieve statewide goals and objectives to increase access to, improve the quality of, and enhance the accountability for its postsecondary education system.

Therefore, the legislature declares that the policy of the state of Washington is to create an environment in which the state institutions of higher education have the authority and flexibility to enhance attainment of statewide goals and objectives for the state's postsecondary education system through decisions and actions at the local level. The policy shall have the following attributes:

(1) The accomplishment of equitable and adequate enrollment by significantly raising enrollment lids, adequately funding those increases, and providing sufficient financial aid for the neediest students;

(2) The development and use of a new definition of quality measured by effective operations and clear results; the efficient use of funds to achieve well-educated students;

(3) The attainment of a new resource management relationship that removes the state from micromanagement, allows institutions greater management autonomy to focus resources on essential functions, and encourages innovation; and

(4) The development of a system of coordinated planning and sufficient feedback to assure policymakers and citizens that students are succeeding and resources are being prudently deployed." [ 1993 c 363 s 1.]

Effective date—1993 c 363: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1993." [ 1993 c 363 s 7.]

Project of statewide significance—Defined: RCW 43.157.010.